Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Livestock at Large on Federal or State Highways.

§ 69-13-101.
Unlawful for livestock to roam at large on federal or state designated highways.

It shall be and is hereby declared unlawful for any livestock to roam at large on the federal or state designated paved highways or highway rights-of-way of the State of Mississippi, except, however, that in those counties that have heretofore voted to come out from under the statewide stock law this shall only apply to U.S. designated highways, Mississippi Highway 55, and all paved Mississippi highways where said highways traverse more than one (1) county and connect directly with another paved highway in another state being extensively traveled by citizens of other states, and the rights-of-way thereof; and except also that this section shall not apply to any such highway or highway right-of-way or any type of highway or road located on any levee maintained by the Board of Mississippi Levee Commissioners or the board of levee commissioners for the Yazoo-Mississippi Delta through maintenance contracts calling for or permitting pasturage of livestock on levee rights-of-way.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 331, eff from and after passage (approved March 1, 1979).

§ 69-13-103.
Responsibility of commissioner of public safety for impounding of livestock; authority of supervisors.

The commissioner of public safety shall be placed in charge of and be responsible for the taking up and impounding of livestock found on the highways or highway right-of-ways described in Section 69-13-101. The commissioner of public safety is authorized, in his discretion, to secure the services of any person or persons residing in the respective counties of the state where he deems it necessary or advisable, other than an elected county officer, who shall assist the highway safety patrol in taking up such loose livestock and impounding the same in a private enclosure, which the private individual provides, without any cost to the state, such an individual being paid solely from the fees and assessments hereinafter provided against any such livestock. The commissioner of public safety, in the alternative, may require that such livestock be impounded in an enclosure, in the event the board of supervisors of that county has provided such an enclosure for that purpose.

A private individual hired by the commissioner of public safety to pick up loose livestock may not pick up such livestock off the highways and highway right-of-ways unless a state highway patrolman, or a sheriff or his deputy, or a constable, or some other law enforcement officer is present at the time such livestock is picked up.

The board of supervisors of each county within the State of Mississippi may, in its discretion, make provision for the care of animals so taken up and impounded under the provisions of this article and all county officers and law enforcement officers are directed to give full cooperation to the highway safety patrol in carrying out the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 463, § 1.

§ 69-13-105.
Charges against impounded livestock.

The fees, assessments, liens and charges against livestock picked up and impounded under Sections 69-13-101 and 69-13-103 are as follows:

An assessment of Ten Dollars ($10.00) per head, which shall go to the private individual employed by the commissioner of public safety to perform such work.

Two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($2.50) per head, which shall be an impoundment fee, One Dollar ($1.00) of which shall be forwarded, for each animal impounded, to the state treasurer, earmarked for the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, on the first day of each month, and the balance of One Dollar and Fifty Cents ($1.50) shall be deposited in the general county fund of the county in which the animal is impounded.

There shall be an assessment of One Dollar and Fifty Cents ($1.50) per day, per head of impounded livestock, such assessment to be deposited in the general county fund to pay for the cost of feeding and caring for such livestock, if the livestock is impounded in a county-owned and operated enclosure, but if the animal is impounded in a private enclosure provided by the private individual employed by the commissioner of public safety, such fee shall be paid to that individual.

Any incidental costs, such as securing the services of a veterinarian, a milker or other necessary incidental expenses.

All the above assessments, fees and costs shall be and are hereby made a first and paramount lien upon such animals until same are paid in full, and upon the sale of the livestock, as provided in this article, all such assessments shall be withheld and taken from the proceeds of the sale and paid to the proper person, officer or fund as set forth above prior to the payment of any amount to the original owner of the animal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 321, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1973).

§ 69-13-107.
Highway safety patrol to provide equipment or contract with private individuals to remove livestock.

The Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall, in the alternative:

Provide necessary equipment to remove such livestock from the highways and shall impound all livestock found on all highways as provided in this article, or

Contract for and obtain the services of private individuals to remove such livestock from the highways and impound the same in the private pen or enclosures provided by such private individuals, in accordance with the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876.03; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 463, § 2.

§ 69-13-109.
Description of impounded livestock to be published; form; notice of sale.

When any livestock shall have been taken up and impounded in the enclosure to be provided by the board of supervisors, the sheriff of said county or counties shall be responsible for having the descriptions of all such livestock published in one weekly newspaper with general circulation in that part of the county where livestock was taken up. Such notice shall be in substantially the following form:

“To Whom It May Concern:

You are hereby notified that the following described livestock (giving full and accurate description of same, including marks and brands) is now impounded at (giving location where livestock is impounded) and the amount due by reason of such impounding is $ dollars per day. The above described livestock will, unless redeemed within five (5) days from date hereof, be offered for sale at public auction to the highest and best bidder for cash. Date Sheriff of County, Mississippi” Unless the impounded livestock is redeemed within five days from date of notice, the sheriff shall forthwith give notice of sale thereof which shall be held not less than five days nor more than twelve days (excluding Sundays and holidays) from the first publication of the notice of sale. Said notice of sale shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the said county (excluding Sundays and holidays) and by posting a copy of such notice at the court house door. If there be no such newspaper then by posting such copy at the court house door and at two other conspicuous places in said county. Such notice of sale shall be in substantially the following form: “(Name of owner, if known, otherwise ’To Whom It May Concern’) you are hereby notified that I will offer for sale and sell at public sale to the highest and best bidder for cash the following described livestock (giving full and accurate description of each head of livestock) at o’clock, .M. (the hour of sale to be between 11 o’clock A.M. and 2 o’clock P.M. Central Standard Time) on the day of at the following place: (which place shall be where the livestock is impounded or at the place provided by the county commissioners for the taking up and keeping of such livestock) to satisfy a claim in the sum of for fees, expenses for feeding and care and costs hereof. Date Sheriff of County, Mississippi”

Click to view

If the rightful owners shall claim the impounded animals, they may do so by paying all assessments or liens as herein provided, after signing for them on forms provided by the commissioner of public safety, such forms to include the descriptions of said animals. All receipts shall be deposited in a special fund known as the “Sheriff’s Livestock Sale Fund.” If it is later determined who the rightful owners are, the sheriff may have refunded to them the selling price after all liens are paid. Any funds accrued in this account shall, on June first of each year, be transferred to the general county fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-02; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 2, eff from and after six months after passage (approved April 5, 1956).

§ 69-13-111.
Owners of livestock roaming at large liable for damages.

The owners of livestock which through their owner’s negligence are found on federal or state designated paved highways or highway rights-of-way shall be subject to any damages as a result of wrecks, loss of life or bodily injury as a result of said livestock being on the above designated highways. The burden shall be on the owner of any such livestock to prove lack of negligence. This section shall not be applicable to any such highway or highway right-of-way or any type of highway or road located on any levee maintained by the Board of Mississippi Levee Commissioners or the board of levee commissioners for the Yazoo-Mississippi Delta through maintenance contracts calling for or permitting pasturage of livestock on levee rights-of-way.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 5; Laws, 1979, ch. 330, eff from and after passage (approved March 1, 1979).

§ 69-13-113.
State or county not liable for injury to impounded livestock.

Neither the state nor any county shall be liable for any injury which may occur to livestock which is picked up and removed from the highways and highway right-of-ways and impounded, or which may be sold under the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-03.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 463, § 3.

§ 69-13-115.
Penalty for removal of impounded livestock without paying fees.

Any person who wrongfully removes impounded livestock from the enclosure provided by the board of supervisors under this article, without paying all fees and assessments against same, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as in other cases provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 4, eff from and after six months after passage (approved April 5, 1956).

§ 69-13-117.
Nature and construction of article.

This article is cumulative and in addition to all other livestock laws and does not repeal any presently existing laws with reference to the powers and duties of the county ranger of the law on estrays. This article shall be liberally interpreted in order to accomplish its purpose and it shall not be interpreted to repeal any law unless specifically so provided herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4876-07; Laws, 1956, ch. 140, § 7, eff from and after six months after passage (approved April 5, 1956).